Utah statutes.
65A-8-206.   Disbursements from the Wildland Fire Suppression Fund.
(1)  Disbursements from the fund shall be made only upon written order of the
state forester or his authorized representative.
(2)  If the state forester determines monies in the fund may be insufficient
to cover eligible costs in a program year, the state forester may delay making
disbursements from the fund until the close of the program year, at which time
available monies shall be prorated among those entitled to payments at less
than 100%.
